Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 390.180 is amended to read:
390.180. (1) The State Parks and Recreation Director shall adopt rules that:
(a) Establish the standards the State Parks and Recreation Department shall use when  that de-
partment:
(A) Performs comprehensive statewide recreational planning; or
(B) Disburses any moneys to tribal, regional or local  governments or other state agencies under
programs established under state or federal law.
(b) Establish a process for the development of a master plan for each state park, including public
participation and coordination with affected local governments.
(c) Establish a master plan for each  state park, including an assessment of resources and a de-
termination of the  capacity for public use and enjoyment of each park, that the State Parks and
Recreation Department shall follow in its development and use of each park.
(d) Make state funding assistance available to tribal, regional or local governments that dem-
onstrate cooperation with nonprofit veterans’ organizations for the construction and restoration  of
memorials honoring veterans and war memorials located on public property.
(2) The State Parks  and Recreation Director shall submit an adopted state park master plan to
the local government with land use planning responsibility for the subject park.Enrolled House Bill 2405 (HB 2405-INTRO) Page 1
Passed by House February 23, 2017
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate May 11, 2017
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Dennis Richardson, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2405 (HB 2405-INTRO) Page 2